New York, session 2025-2026, A3689.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 502 of the labor law is amended by adding a new 2 undesignated paragraph to read as follows: 3 Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary, to achieve cost savings 4 to businesses and the state, improve decision timeliness, and minimize 5 wrong-sized payments to eligible beneficiaries the department shall 6 obtain current employment and income information from a third-party 7 provider, supplementing current state wage reporting files from the 8 department of taxation and finance. 9 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00420-01-5